Nebraska, session 109, LB441.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-6401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-6401 Sections 71-6401 to 71-6408 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Building Construction Act.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Authorized inspector means an individual credentialed with the state
agency, county, city, or village issuing permits or a third-party inspector
registered or licensed with the State of Nebraska contracted as a result of
project specification requirements. Authorized inspector does not include an
individual performing a self-performed inspection for the individual's own
permit or building; and
(b) Inspection records means the pass or fail results, including the
reasons for failure or deviation from project specifications, of any inspection
required by the permitting entity as a condition of construction in association
with the address of the permit requested or issued.
(2)(a) Any state agency, county, city, or village that requires an
inspection as part of a building permit may allow for virtual inspection by an
authorized inspector if the following conditions are met:
(i) The inspection is of an area of a single-family or two-family
residential building that is less than three stories in height and under ten
thousand square feet;
(ii) The individual requesting or holding the building permit has provided
the name of the contractor who is licensed or registered in such state, county,
city, or village and who is completing the work to be virtually inspected; and
(iii) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, the
virtual inspection is conducted live with both the individual requesting or
holding the building permit and the authorized inspector.
(b) Inspections required for building permits of a nonstructural nature,
as determined by the permitting entity, may be conducted using video or photo
documentation for any reinspection.
(3) Any state agency, county, city, or village that utilizes virtual
inspections shall not be required to publicize the name of the contractor who
is provided in subdivision (2)(a) of this section.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-6401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
-1-